Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 10 Communications Systems
12-10-304. Public safety answering points.

The chief executive of a political subdivision may:

Designate the public safety answering point of another political subdivision to serve his or her political subdivision as a public safety answering point only; or

Retain a dispatch center to serve both public safety answering point and dispatch functions.

A designation under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be in the form of a written mutual aid agreement between the political subdivisions, with approval from the Arkansas 911 Board, and shall include that a fair share of funding shall be contributed by the political subdivision being served to the political subdivision operating the public safety answering point.

Moneys necessary for the fair share of funding may be generated:

As authorized in this subchapter;

By funds received by or allocated by the Arkansas 911 Board; and

By any other funds available to the political subdivision unless the use of the funds for 911 services is prohibited by law.

If a designation under subdivision (a)(1) of this section and a mutual aid agreement are made, an additional public safety answering point shall not be created without termination of the mutual aid agreement.

A public safety answering point established under this subchapter may serve the jurisdiction of more than one (1) public agency of the political subdivision or, through mutual aid agreements, more than one (1) political subdivision.

This subchapter does not prohibit or discourage in any manner the formation of multiagency or multijurisdictional public safety answering points.

The chief executive of a political subdivision may contract with a private entity to operate a public safety answering point under rules established by the Arkansas 911 Board.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Public safety answering points” for “911 communication centers — Creation” in the section heading, and rewrote the section.

Developing a plan no later than January 1, 2022, to provide funding for no more than seventy-seven (77) public safety answering points to operate in the state.

If the Arkansas 911 Board determines it is necessary, the Arkansas 911 Board may provide funding for more or fewer than seventy-seven (77) public safety answering points with a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the Arkansas 911 Board;

Within one (1) year of July 24, 2019, promulgating rules necessary to:

Establish guidelines for Arkansas public safety answering points in accordance with the Association of Public-Safety Communications Officials International, Inc. and the National Emergency Number Association;

Create standards for public safety answering point interoperability between counties and states; and

Assist all public safety answering points in implementing a next generation 911 system in the State of Arkansas;

Receiving and reviewing all 911 certifications submitted by public safety answering points in accordance with standards developed by the Arkansas 911 Board;

Auditing any money expended by a political subdivision for the operation of a service supplier;

Providing an annual report to the Governor and the Legislative Council.

The report shall include a review and assessment of sustainability and the feasibility of further reduction of the required number of public safety answering points resulting from the standardization of operational processes and training and the implementation of next generation 911 service;

Establishing and maintaining an interest-bearing account into which shall be deposited revenues transferred to the Arkansas 911 Board from the Arkansas Public Safety Trust Fund and the Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board; and

Managing and disbursing the funds from the interest-bearing account described in subdivision (b)(6) of this section.

In determining the population basis for distribution of funds, the Arkansas 911 Board shall determine, based on the latest federal decennial census, the population of:

All unincorporated areas of counties operating a public safety answering point that has the capacity to receive commercial mobile radio service, voice over internet protocol service, or nontraditional 911 calls on dedicated 911 trunk lines; and

All incorporated areas of counties operating a public safety answering point that has the capacity to receive commercial mobile radio service, voice over protocol service, or nontraditional 911 calls on dedicated 911 trunk lines;

To purchase a statewide infrastructure for next generation 911, including without limitation ESINet, connectivity costs, and next generation 911 components and equipment; and

By public safety answering points for upgrading, purchasing, programming, installing, and maintaining necessary data, basic 911 geographic information system mapping, hardware, and software, including any network elements required to supply enhanced 911 phase II cellular, voice over internet protocol, and other nontraditional telephone services, in connection with compliance with Federal Communications Commission requirements.

A political subdivision operating a public safety answering point shall present invoices to the Arkansas 911 Board in connection with any request for reimbursement under subdivision (d)(2)(A)(ii) of this section.

A request for reimbursement shall be approved by a majority vote of the Arkansas 911 Board.

Any invoices presented to the Arkansas 911 Board for reimbursements of costs not described by subdivision (d)(2)(B)(ii) of this section may be approved only by a majority vote of the Arkansas 911 Board;

Not more than one and twenty-five hundredths (1.25%) of the monthly revenues may be used by the Arkansas 911 Board to compensate the independent auditor and for administrative expenses, staff, and consulting services; and

All interest received shall be disbursed as prescribed in this subsection.

The Arkansas 911 Board may:

Withhold for no less than six (6) months any additional revenue generated by the public safety charge and the prepaid public safety charge under this subchapter; and

Calculate a monthly payment amount based on the prior calendar year certifications and remit that amount to the eligible governing body on a monthly basis.

All cities and counties operating a public safety answering point shall submit to the Arkansas 911 Board no later than April 1 of each calendar year the following information in the form of a report:

An explanation and accounting of the funds received by the city or county and expenditures of the funds received for the previous calendar year, along with a copy of the budget for the previous calendar year and a copy of the year-end appropriation and expenditure analysis of any participating or supporting counties, cities, or agencies;

Any information requested by the Arkansas 911 Board concerning local public safety answering point operations, facilities, equipment, personnel, network, interoperability, call volume, telecommunicator training, and supervisor training;

A copy of all documents reflecting 911 funds received for the previous calendar year, including without limitation wireless, wireline, general revenues, sales taxes, and other sources used by the city or county for 911 services; and

The name of each telecommunicator, the telecommunicator's date of hire, the telecommunicator's date of termination, if applicable, and approved courses by the Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training completed by the telecommunicator, including without limitation “train the trainer” courses.

The chief executive for each public safety answering point shall gather the information necessary for the report under subdivision (f)(1) of this section and provide the report and a copy of the certification of the public safety answering point to the Arkansas 911 Board and to the county intergovernmental coordination council for use in conducting the annual review of services under § 14-27-104.

The Arkansas 911 Board may withhold all or part of the disbursement to a public safety answering point if the report of an auditor or the Arkansas 911 Board otherwise confirms that the public safety answering point improperly used funds disbursed by the Arkansas 911 Board for purposes other than those authorized by § 12-10-323.

Each county shall complete locatable address conversion of 911 physical address, assignment, and mapping within the county and certify to the Arkansas 911 Board that the locatable address conversion is completed no later than the last business day of February 2020.

Failure to comply with this section may result in the Arkansas 911 Board's withholding funds from the public safety answering point.

The Arkansas 911 Board may contract for 911 services in the implementation of the next generation 911.

The Director of the Division of Emergency Management may:

Enter, assign, assume, and execute contract extensions that would otherwise lapse during the transition period between the Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board and the Arkansas 911 Board; and

Work with the Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board to ensure a smooth transition between the Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board and the Arkansas 911 Board.

The Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board shall continue to receive and disburse funds and continue operations up to the last business day of December 2019.

All emergency telephone service charges collected but not yet disbursed, other moneys, and any remaining balance in the interest-bearing account of the Arkansas Emergency Telephone Services Board shall be transferred to the Arkansas 911 Board by the last business day of December 2019.

Publisher's Notes.Former §12-10-305 is now codified as amended as §12-10-304(a)-(c).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, §§ 2, 4, 7; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 73-1823, 73-1825, 73-1828; Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3.

12-10-305. Arkansas 911 Board.

(1)There is created the Arkansas 911 Board to consist of the following members:

The Director of the Division of Emergency Management or his or her designee;

The Auditor of State or his or her designee;

The State Geographic Information Officer of the Arkansas Geographic Information Systems Office or his or her designee;

One (1) county judge appointed by the Association of Arkansas Counties;

One (1) mayor appointed by the Arkansas Municipal League;

One (1) 911 coordinator, director, or telecommunicator appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;

One (1) 911 coordinator, director, or telecommunicator appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate;

One (1) police chief appointed by the Arkansas Association of Chiefs of Police; and

The following members to be appointed by the Governor:

One (1) Emergency Management Director of a political subdivision;

One (1) sheriff;

One (1) representative of emergency medical services; and

One (1) fire chief.

(A)The members under subdivisions (a)(1)(G), (a)(1)(I)(i), (a)(1)(I)(iii), and (a)(1)(I)(iv) of this section shall serve a term of two (2) years.

The members under subdivisions (a)(1)(D), (a)(1)(E), (a)(1)(F), (a)(1)(H), and (a)(1)(I)(ii) of this section shall serve a term of four (4) years.

Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment and each member shall serve until a qualified successor is appointed.

The Director of the Division of Emergency Management shall serve as the chair and call the first meeting no later than thirty (30) days after the appointment of the majority of the members of the Arkansas 911 Board.

The Arkansas 911 Board shall establish bylaws.

The duties of the Arkansas 911 Board shall include without limitation:

The Arkansas 911 Board shall have all powers necessary to fulfill the duties of the Arkansas 911 Board, including without limitation power to enter, assign, and assume contracts.

The Arkansas 911 Board shall disburse from the interest-bearing account described in subdivision (b)(6) of this section in the following manner:

(A)Not less than eighty-three and seventy-five hundredths percent (83.75%) of the total monthly revenues shall be distributed on a population basis to each political subdivision operating a public safety answering point that has the capability of receiving 911 calls on dedicated 911 trunk lines for expenses incurred for answering, routing, and proper disposition of 911 calls, including payroll costs, readiness costs, and training costs associated with wireless, voice over internet protocol, and nontraditional 911 calls.

(A)Not more than fifteen percent (15%) of the total monthly revenues may be used:

History.

Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3.

12-10-306. Communications personnel.

The staff and supervisors of a public safety answering point or dispatch center shall be:

Paid employees, either sworn officers or civilians, of the operating agency designated by the chief executive of the political subdivisions.

Personnel other than law enforcement or fire officers shall be considered public safety officers for the purposes of public safety communications or engaging by contract with the operating agency;

Required to submit to criminal background checks for security clearances before accessing files available through the Arkansas Crime Information Center if the public safety answering point or dispatch center is charged with information service functions for criminal justice agencies of the political subdivision;

Trained in operation of 911 system equipment and other training as necessary to operate a public safety answering point or dispatch center, or both;

Subject to the authority of the affiliated agency and the chief executive of the political subdivision through the public safety answering point or dispatch center; and

Required to immediately release without the consent or approval of any supervisor or other entity any information in their custody or control to a prosecuting attorney if requested by a subpoena issued by a prosecutor, grand jury, or any court for use in the prosecution or the investigation of any criminal or suspected criminal activity.

The staff or supervisor of a public safety answering point or dispatch center, or both, an operating agency, and the service supplier are not liable in any civil action as a result of complying with a subpoena as required in subdivision (5)(A) of this section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The repeal set out under §12-10-306 in Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3, has been codified at §12-10-307 to better reflect the provisions deleted and retained by Acts 2019, No. 660.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (a)(5).

The 2009 amendment inserted “911” in (a)(5)(B), and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Communications personnel” for “Public safety communications personnel” in the section heading, and rewrote the section.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The repeal set out under §12-10-306 in Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3, has been codified at §12-10-307 to better reflect the provisions deleted and retained by Acts 2019, No. 660.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning transmission of requests, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3, effective July 24, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 683, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1828. For current law, see §12-10-308(a).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1829;
Acts 2007, No. 651, § 1; 2009, No. 165, § 1; 2019, No. 660, § 3.

12-10-307. [Repealed.]

A public safety answering point shall be capable of transmitting requests for law enforcement, firefighting, disaster, or major emergency response, emergency medical or ambulance services, or other emergency services to a public or private agency where the services are available to the political subdivision in the public safety answering point's jurisdiction.

A public safety answering point or dispatch center, or both, which receives a request for emergency response outside its jurisdiction shall promptly forward the request to the public safety answering point or public safety agency responsible for that geographical area.

Any emergency unit dispatched to a location outside its jurisdiction in response to such a request shall render service to the requesting party until relieved by the public safety agency responsible for that geographical area.

Political subdivisions may enter into mutual aid agreements to carry out the provisions of this section.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added (a) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and substituted “public safety answering point or dispatch center, or both” for “911 public safety communications center” in (b).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1828; Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3.

12-10-309. Requests from the hearing and speech impaired.

Each public safety answering point or dispatch center shall be equipped with a system for the processing of requests from the hearing and speech impaired for emergency response.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1828; Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “public safety answering point or dispatch center” for “911 public safety communications center”.

12-10-310. Records of calls.

The public safety answering point shall develop and maintain a system for recording 911 calls received at the public safety answering point.

A dispatch center shall develop and maintain a system that has been approved by the Arkansas 911 Board for recording 911 calls transferred from a public safety answering point.

All information contained with or attached to a 911 call, including without limitation short message service, text, video, and photographs, shall be retained.

The records shall be retained for a period of at least one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of the call and shall include the following information:

Date and time the call was received;

The nature of the problem; and

Action taken by the telecommunicators.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment in (a), substituted “public safety answering point” for “911 public safety communications center” and deleted the second sentence; inserted (b) and (c); redesignated former (b) as (d);substituted “one hundred eighty (180) days” for “thirty one (31) days” in the introductory language of (d); and substituted “telecommunicators” for “911 public safety communications center personnel” in (d)(3).

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning methods of response and restricted use of 911, were repealed by Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3, effective July 24, 2019. The sections were derived from:

12-10-311. Acts 1985, No. 683, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1828.

12-10-312.Acts 1985, No. 683, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1830; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 31.

For current law comparable to former §12-10-312, see §12-10-313(a).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added “Restrictions and” in the section heading; added (a) and (b); redesignated former (a) and (b) as (c) and (d); substituted “public safety answering point and dispatch center” for “911 public safety communications center” in (c); and deleted former (c).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1828; Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3.

12-10-311, 12-10-312. [Repealed.]

The telephone number 911 is restricted to emergency calls that may result in dispatch of the appropriate response service for fire suppression and rescue, emergency medical services or ambulance, hazardous material incidents, disaster or major emergency occurrences, and law enforcement activities.

Any person calling the telephone number 911 for the purpose of making a false alarm or complaint or reporting false information that could result in the emergency dispatch of any public safety agency upon conviction is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Each public safety answering point and dispatch center will maintain a published nonemergency telephone number, and nonemergency calls should be received on that number.

Transfers of calls from 911 trunks to nonemergency numbers are discouraged because that ties up 911 trunks and may interfere with true emergency calls.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1830; Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3.

12-10-314. Connection of network to automatic alarms, etc., prohibited.

No person shall connect to a service supplier's network any automatic alarm or other automatic alerting devices which cause the number 911 to be automatically dialed and provide a prerecorded message in order to directly access the services which may be obtained through a public safety answering point.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 683, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1830; Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “public safety answering point” for “911 public safety communications center”.

12-10-315. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the penalty for a false alarm, complaint, or information, was repealed by Acts 2019, No. 660, § 3, effective July 24, 2019. The section was derived from Acts 1985, No. 683, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1831. For current law, see §12-10-313(b).

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

12-10-316. Public safety answering points — Access to information.

A public safety answering point and dispatch center designated by the chief executive of the political subdivision may be considered an element in the communications network connecting state, county, and local authorities to a centralized state depository of information in order to serve the public safety and criminal justice community.

A public safety answering point and dispatch center is restricted in that it may access files in the centralized state depository of information only for the purpose of providing information to:

An end user as authorized by state law; and

An authorized recipient of the contents of those files, in the absence of serving as an information service agency.

The designation of the public safety answering point as an information provider to an authorized recipient and an agency of a political subdivision shall be made by the chief executive of each political subdivision.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted the (1), (1)(A), (1)(B) and (2) designations in (b) and made related changes; in present (b)(1), deleted “these” preceding “files” and inserted “in the centralized state depository of information”; in present (b)(2), added “The 911 public safely communication centers” and substituted “shall” for “will” and “have” for “be authorized”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Public safety answering points” for “911 centers” in the section heading; substituted “public safety answering point and dispatch center” for “911 public safety communications center” in (a) and in the introductory language of (b); redesignated (b)(1) as (b); redesignated (b)(1)(A) and (b)(1)(B) as (b)(1) and (b)(2), respectively; deleted former (b)(2); and inserted “of the public safety answering point” in (c).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Public safety answering point” for “911 center” in the section heading; inserted the first occurrence of “response” in (a)(2); in (a)(3), substituted “A service” for “No service” and substituted “are not liable” for “shall be liable”; redesignated (b) as (b)(1) and (b)(2); in (b)(1), substituted “public safety answering point and dispatch center” for “911 public safety communications center”, and “system’s” for “system”; substituted “point’s” for “point” in (b)(2); and made stylistic changes.

The public safety charge shall:

Appear as a single line item on a subscriber's bill;

Not be assessed upon more than two hundred (200):

Exchange access facilities per person per location; or

Voice over internet protocol connections per person per location; and

Not be subject to any state or local tax or franchisee fee.

To verify the accuracy of the monthly remittances that a service supplier makes to the Arkansas Public Safety Trust Fund, a service supplier shall provide copies of required federal filings at least biannually to the Division of Emergency Management.

No later than thirty (30) days following the filing of the required federal telecommunications reports, a service supplier shall provide a copy of the federal filing, and the Federal Communications Commission Form 477 or its equivalent, including the number of access lines used by the service supplier in the state.

Due to the proprietary nature of the information in the reports required in subdivision (e)(1) of this section which, if disclosed, would provide a competitive advantage for other service suppliers, the reports shall be confidential and only subject to review by:

The Director of the Division of Emergency Management; and

The designee of the Arkansas 911 Board.

However, audit reports may be released that contain only aggregate numbers and do not disclose proprietary information including numbers or revenue attributable to an individual service supplier.

This section does not prohibit a service supplier from billing, collecting, or retaining an additional amount to reimburse the service supplier for enabling and providing 911, enhanced 911, and next generation 911 services and capabilities in the network and for the facilities and associated equipment.

To avoid an overlap in the assessment of the old and new charges for subscribers for every service supplier obligated to pay the public safety charge, a transition to the payment of the public safety charge shall occur.

The assessment of charges before October 1, 2019, shall continue through September 30, 2019, and be remitted in the same manner to the same entity as previously prescribed under this section beforeOctober 1, 2019.

Any unpaid assessments for the time period up to and including September 30, 2019, shall remain due and payable under the terms and processes that are or were in place at the time.

Beginning on October 1, 2019, a service supplier is subject to the public safety charges assessed as described in this section.

After October 1, 2019, a service supplier shall remit all assessments of the public safety charge for a calendar month by the fifteenth business day of the following month to the Arkansas Public Safety Trust Fund.

The Arkansas Public Safety Trust Fund shall provide disbursements as provided by § 19-5-1152.

To provide additional funding for the public safety answering point, the political subdivision may:

Receive and appropriate any federal, state, county, or municipal funds and funds from a private source; and

Expend the funds described in subdivision (h)(1) of this section to operate and maintain a public safety answering point.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the law, in no event shall any commercial mobile radio, voice over internet protocol service, or nontraditional service provider, or its officers, employees, assigns, or agents be liable for civil damages or criminal liability in connection with the development, design, installation, operation, maintenance, performance, or provision of a 911 service.

Nor shall any commercial mobile radio, voice over internet protocol, or nontraditional service provider, its officers, employees, assigns, or agents be liable for civil damages or be criminally liable in connection with the release of subscriber information to any governmental entity as required under the provisions of this subchapter.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Pursuant to §1-2-207, subdivision (a)(2) of this section is set out as amended by Acts 2007, No. 1049, § 33. Acts 2007, No 582, § 2 amended former subdivision (a)(2)(B)(i) to read as follows:

“The special election shall occur on the second Tuesday of any month unless the second Tuesday of the month is a legal holiday in which event the special election shall be held on the third Tuesday of the month.”

As enacted by Acts 2009, No. 1221, § 2, the last sentence of subdivision (c)(2)(b)(ii)(a) of this section reads: “The board shall report to Legislative Council in the event the sum held under this subdivision becomes less than three million five hundred dollars ($3,500,000).” The omission of “thousand” appears to be a typographical error.

Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5834 and 5835 amended former subdivisions (c)(1)(D) and (c)(2)(B)(i)(b) of this section to replace “Arkansas Department” with “Division” and “Arkansas Commission on” with “Division of”. However, Acts 2019, No 660, § 4 specifically repealed these subdivisions.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment by No. 1997, in (b)(1)(A), substituted “forty cents (40¢)” for “fifty cents (50¢),” “place of primary use” for “billing address,” and deleted “or with respect to which the mobile identification number for the commercial mobile radio service connection contains an area code assigned to Arkansas by the North American Numbering Plan Administrator” at the end; rewrote (b)(1)(B)(i); in (b)(1)(B)(ii), deleted “approved by the voters and” preceding “implemented,” and substituted “forty cents (40¢)” for “fifty cents (50¢)”; in (b)(1)(C), deleted “and (B)” following “(b)(1)(A),” and inserted “less administrative fees under subdivision (b)(3) of this section”; deleted “approved by the voters and” preceding “implemented” in (b)(1)(E); deleted (b)(2)(B)(ii) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; in present (b)(2)(B)(ii), substituted “less than forty-nine percent (49%)” for “more than thirty-eight percent (38%)” and inserted “and remitted” following “collected”; in present (b)(2)(B)(ii), substituted “more than forty-nine percent (49%)” for “less than fifty-eight percent (58%),” inserted “and remitted” following “collected,” deleted “and the commercial mobile radio service providers licensed to do business in Arkansas” following “public safety answering points” and inserted “basic 911 mapping”; in (b)(2)(B)(ii)(c) , substituted “Not more than one percent (1%)” for “Up to three percent (3%)”; added (b)(2)(B)(ii)(e) ; and, in present (b)(2)(B)(iv), deleted “and commercial mobile radio service providers” and substituted “subdivision (b)(1)(A)” for “subdivisions (b)(1)(A) and (B).”

The 2005 amendment by No. 2145 added (a)(2)(B).

The 2009 amendment by No. 1221 substituted “sixty-five cents (65¢)” for “fifty cents (50¢)” in (b)(1)(A)(i), (b)(1)(A)(ii)(b) , (b)(1)(B)(i), (b)(1)(B)(ii)(a) , (b)(1)(C), and (b)(1)(D); in (c)(2)(B)(i), substituted “eighty-three and five-tenths percent (83.5%)” for “forty-nine percent (49%)” and inserted “readiness costs”; in (c)(2)(B)(ii)(a) , substituted “fifteen percent (15%)” for “forty-nine percent (49%)” and inserted the last sentence; inserted “and maintaining” in (c)(2)(B)(ii)(b) ; substituted “five-tenths percent (0.5%)” for “one percent (1%)” in (c)(2)(B)(iii); in (c)(2)(B)(v)(a) , substituted “April 1” for “March 1” and inserted “along with a copy ... counties, cities, or agencies”; inserted (c)(2)(B)(v)(b)(2) and redesignated the existing text of (c)(2)(B)(v)(b) accordingly; and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment by No. 1480 substituted “§7-11-201 et seq.”for “§7-5-103(b)” in (a)(2).

The 2011 amendment inserted (c)(2)(B)(i)(b) ; inserted “(c)(2)(B)(ii)(a) ” in (c)(2)(B)(ii)(a) ;and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (c)(2)(C)(i).

The 2013 amendment by No. 623 deleted former (b)(1)(B) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; in (b)(1)(D), deleted “Except for prepaid wireless telephone service” from the beginning, deleted “and any additional amounts implemented under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section” preceding “and collected”, and inserted “Pub. L. No. 106-252”; substituted “shall” for “will” in (c)(2)(A); substituted “interest-bearing account established under subdivision (c)(2)(A)” for “the account levied under subdivision (b)(1)(A)” in (c)(2)(B); inserted “and prepaid wireless E911 charges under §12-10-326” in (c)(2)(A), (c)(2)(B)(i)(a) , (c)(2)(B)(ii)(a) , (c)(2)(B)(iii), and (c)(2)(D); and inserted “from service charges” in (c)(2)(D).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1170 added (c)(1)(D) through (c)(1)(F).

The 2015 amendment substituted “two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000)” for “one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000)” in (c)(2)(B)(i)(b) ; redesignated (c)(2)(B)(v)(a) as (c)(2)(B)(v)(a)(1) and inserted designation (A) in that subdivision; added (c)(2)(B)(v)(a)(1)(B) ; substituted “operating a public safety answering point or a secondary public safety answering point” for “receiving funds under this section” in the introductory language of (c)(2)(B)(v)(a)(1) ; added (c)(2)(B)(v)(a)(2) through (4) ; inserted (c)(2)(B)(v)(b) and (c) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions of (c)(2)(B)(v) accordingly; and substituted “under” for “to ensure that the funds have been properly utilized according to” in present (c)(2)(B)(v)(d)(1) .

The 2019 amendment by No. 660 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Emergency Management” for “Arkansas Department of Emergency Management” in (c)(1)(D); and substituted “Division of Law Enforcement Standards and Training” for “Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training” in (c)(2)(B)(i)(b) .

U.S. Code. The Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, Pub. L. No. 106-252, is codified as 4 U.S.C. § 116 et seq.

Cross References. Optional provision of database to vendors, §23-17-413.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 660, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 4 and 8 of this act are effective on and after October 1, 2019”.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2001 Arkansas General Assembly, Tax Law, 24 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 613.

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning reduction and suspension of emergency telephone service charges, and duties, rights, and liability of service supplier in relation to emergency telephone service charges, were repealed by Acts 2019, No. 660, § 5, effective July 24, 2019.The sections were derived from:

12-10-319. Acts 1985, No. 683, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 73-1826.